Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.540

Committing to purchase more crops than plants can process—Violation.

Any processor who, from the information filed with the director, appears to or has committed himself or herself either orally or in writing to purchase more crops than his or her plants are capable of processing shall be in violation of this chapter and his or her dealer's license subject to denial, suspension, or revocation as provided for in RCW 20.01.330.

[ 2011 c 336 s 592; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 19.]